District of Columbia statutes.
47-128

Court fees and fines to be credited to District.

There shall be credited to the District of Columbia that proportion of the fees and fines collected by the United States District Court for the District of Columbia, including fees and fines collected by the offices of the Clerk of that Court, of the Register of Wills of the District of Columbia, and of the United States Marshal for the District of Columbia, as the amount paid by the District of Columbia toward salaries and expenses of such Court and of the offices of the United States Attorney for the District of Columbia and of the United States Marshal for the District of Columbia bears to the total amount of such salaries and expenses; and such proportion of the fees and fines, if any, collected by the United States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit, including fees and fines, if any, collected by the office of the Clerk of that Court, as the amount paid by the District of Columbia toward the salaries and expenses of such Court bears to the total amount of such salaries and expenses.

July 26, 1939, 53 Stat. 1107, ch. 367, title III
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, ch. 646, § 1
Aug. 2, 1949, 63 Stat. 491, ch. 383, § 7
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Budget estimates, reimbursement of the United States for certain judicial expenses, see §§ 47-205 and 47-206.
1981 Ed., § 47-128.
1973 Ed., § 47-126a.